Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.460

Audits—Deadly force investigations.

(1) The office of the Washington state auditor is authorized to conduct a process compliance audit procedure and review of any deadly force investigation conducted pursuant to RCW 10.114.011. At the conclusion of every deadly force investigation, the state auditor shall determine whether the actions of the involved law enforcement agency, investigative body, and prosecutor's office are in compliance with RCW 10.114.011, chapter 43.102 RCW, and all rules adopted pursuant to these provisions for the investigation and reporting of incidents involving the use of deadly force. A deadly force investigation is concluded once the involved prosecutor's office makes a charging decision and any resulting criminal case reaches disposition. Audit procedures under this section shall be conducted in cooperation with the commission.

(2) The state auditor is authorized to access records of arrest, charges, or allegations of criminal conduct or other nonconviction data for the purposes of conducting reviews of any deadly force investigation authorized by this section.

(3) The state auditor may not conduct an audit under this section until adequately staffed with subject matter expertise regarding law enforcement and investigative audits. Until that time, the state auditor shall contract with persons with the appropriate subject matter expertise and shall issue a request for proposal for contracting with a person or entity to provide adequate subject matter expertise.

[ 2023 c 26 s 2; 2021 c 319 s 1.]